Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.080

Restrictions on buildings—Use of land.

(1) The council or board may provide for the preparation by its commission and the adoption and enforcement of coordinated plans for the physical development of the municipality. For this purpose the council or board, in such measure as is deemed reasonably necessary or requisite in the interest of health, safety, morals, and the general welfare, upon recommendation by its commission, by general ordinances of the city or general resolution of the board, may:

(a) Regulate and restrict:

(i) The location and the use of buildings, structures, and land for residence, trade, industrial, and other purposes;

(ii) The height, number of stories, size, construction, and design of buildings and other structures;

(iii) The size of yards, courts, and other open spaces on the lot or tract;

(iv) The density of population;

(v) The setback of buildings along highways, parks, or public water frontages; and

(vi) The subdivision and development of land;

(b) Eliminate the minimum gross floor area requirements for single-family detached dwellings or reduce the requirements below the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code; and

(c) Encourage and protect access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems.

(2) The council of a city where ordinances adopted in accordance with this section are in effect may, on the recommendation of its commission, provide for the appointment of a board of adjustment to make, in appropriate cases and subject to appropriate conditions and safeguards established by ordinance, special exceptions in harmony with the general purposes and intent and in accordance with general or specific rules therein contained.

[ 2018 c 302 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.63.080. Prior: 1935 c 44 s 5; RRS s 9322-5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 170: See note following RCW 64.04.140.